West Virginia, session 2025, SB401.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Real Estate Commission. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on June 27, 2024, authorized under the authority of §30-1-23 of this code, relating to the Real Estate Commission (application of waiver of initial licensing fees for certain individuals, 174 CSR 06), is authorized.